src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Irish morphological analyser                      !
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Irish LANGUAGE.

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

## Tag symbols for analysis
The morphological analyses of wordforms for the Irish
language are presented in this system in terms of the following symbols.

- **+Corr  ** = correction in Learner corpus
- **+Error ** = error in Learner corpus
- **+Start ** = start of error/correction

Tag list:

- **+1P		** = first person inflection
- **+2P		** = second person inflection
- **+3P		** = third person inflection
- **+A		** = XXX check
- **+ABBR		** = Abbreviation
- **+ACR	      	** = Acronym
- **+Abr		** = "Abbreviation"
- **+Ad		** = Adverbial particle: go
- **+Adj		** = Adjective
- **+Adv		** = Adverb
- **+Anon		** = Anonymisation in transcribed speech
- **+Arab		** = Arabic numerals (1, 2, ...) 
- **+Art		** = Article determiner (an/na)
- **+Attr		** = Attribute, element preceeding head
- **+Auto		** = Autonomous verb form
- **+Bar		** = hyphen, underscore, dash etc.
- **+Bare		** = bare number form used after number particle "a"
- **+Base		** = Base form of adjective (changed from +Pos to +Base 10/09/03)
- **+Brack		** = round, square and curly brackets
- **+CC		** = Canúint Chonnachta, Connaught dialect
- **+CLB            ** = Clause boundary
- **+CLBfinal	** = Final clause boundary
- **+CM		** = Canúint na Mumhan, Munster dialect
- **+CU		** = Canúint Uladh, Ulster dialect 
- **+Card		** = Cardinal number(one two three ...)
- **+Cmc		** =  Communicator (yeah, y'know) in transcribed speech
- **+CmpNP/First	** = 
- **+CmpNP/None	** = 
- **+Cmpd		** = Compound prepostion
- **+CmpdNoGen	** = Compound prepostion which does not require genitive case on object NP
- **+Cmpl		** = Complementizer: go, gur, nach, nár
- **+Com		** = Common case (nominative/accusative/dative case)
- **+Comp		** = Comparative adjective (c)
- **+Conj		** = Conjunction
- **+Cond		** = Conditional mood
- **+Coord		** = Coordinating conjunction
- **+Cop		** = Copula
- **+Curr		** = Currency symbols
- **+Dat		** = Dative case (e.g. chois) fossilised forms
- **+DeNom		** = Adjectives drived from proper nouns, e.g. Albanach (Scottish adjective), not the same as Albanais (Scottish language noun)
- **+Def		** = Definite article
- **+DefArt		** = noun/number form that follows a definite article (an)
- **+Deg		** = degree particle with Adj/Abstract Noun (so loud, so sharp etc..
- **+Dem		** = Demonstrative determiner (also combined with copula, e.g. Seo
- **+Dep		** = Dependant forms of verbs
- **+Det		** = Determiner, e.g. possessive determiner: mo, do
- **+Dir		** = Directional adverb
- **+Direct 	** = Direct relative particle
- **+Ecl		** = Eclipsis (+Urú) initial mutation, e.g. ar an gcat
- **+Emph		** = Emphatic (Contrastive) form of personal pronoun e.g. ár dteachsa, do theachsa, a teachsa
- **+End		** = end bracket, quote etc
- **+English	** = English language words
- **+Err/Hyph	** = 
- **+Err/Lex	** = 
- **+Err/MissingSpace ** = 
- **+Err/Orth 	  ** = Orthografical error
- **+Err/SpaceCmp 	  ** = Compound space error
- **+Event		  ** = Simple Event (laugh, sneeze etc.) in transcribed speech
- **+Fam		  ** = Family Name - proper noun
- **+Fem		  ** = Feminine gender
- **+Filler		  ** = Filled Pause (eh, em, etc.) in transcribed speech 
- **+Fin		  ** = sentence final punctuation
- **+Foreign	  ** = words from other languages, mainly English, some Latin
- **+Fut		  ** = Future tense verbal particle
- **+FutInd		  ** = Future Indicative verb
- **+Gen		  ** = Genitive case
- **+Acc		  ** = Accusative case
- **+Cp		  ** = ?
- **+Wh		  ** = wh word?
- **+Gn		  ** = General adverb
- **+Guess		  ** = Morphological guesser
- **+hPref 		  ** = h prefixed to a vowel-initial word 
- **+Idf		** = Indefinite quantifier/pronoun e.g. aon (any), cibé (whoever), ceachtar/neachtar (either/neither) etc.
- **+Ill		** = n/a
- **+Imp		** = Imperative particle (negative)
- **+Imper		** = Imperative mood
- **+Indirect	** = Indirect relative particle
- **+Inf		** = Infinitival particle
- **+Int		** = Sentence internal punctuation
- **+Itj		** = Interjection
- **+Its		** = Intensifier of adjective e.g. sách, ró- etc.
- **+End		** = end bracket, quote etc
- **+Latin		** = Latin language words
- **+LEFT		** = Left side of parwise symbol (parenthesis or quotation mark)
- **+Len		** = Lenited forms
- **+Loc		** = Locative adverb
- **+MIDDLE		** = Middle punctuation
- **+MWE		** = Multi word expression
- **+Masc		** = Masculine gender
- **+N 		** = n/a (Noun is used) -- The +N tag is in use, TODO: change it
- **+NER		** = Named Entity Recognition
- **+NG			** = Don't generate non-standard form
- **+NStem		** = De-nominal verbal noun
- **+Neg		** = Negative particle (n)
- **+NegQ		** = Negative interrogative verbal particle(q)
- **+Nm			** = Number particle (m)
- **+Nom 		** =
- **+NotSlen	** = Adj qualifies pl noun with non-slender ending
- **+Noun		** = Noun (common, proper, verbal, substantive)
- **+Num		** = Numeral
- **+OLang/ENG	** = - English language words
- **+OLang/FIN	** = - 
- **+OLang/HUN	** = - 
- **+OLang/LAT	** = - Latin language words
- **+OLang/NNO	** = - 
- **+OLang/NOB	** = - 
- **+OLang/RUS	** = - 
- **+OLang/SMA	** = - 
- **+OLang/SME	** = - 
- **+OLang/SMJ	** = - 
- **+OLang/SWE	** = - 
- **+OLang/UND	** = - 
- **+Obj		** = Object e.g. á = "do a" when obj of VN
- **+Op			** = Number Operators, e.g. +,-,*,/ etc.
- **+Ord		** = Ordinal (first, second, third..) i.e.  mo dhá lámh, an chéad dhá theach 
- **+Part		** = Particle (not +Vb) (U)
- **+Past		** = Past tense verbal particle
- **+PastImp	** = Past Habitual - Gháthchaite (Imperfect Indicative)
- **+PastInd	** = Past Indicative tense
- **+PastSubj	** = Past Subjunctive tense
- **+Pat		** = Patronymic particle (p) (e.g. Ó, Ní, Uí, le, de ..)
- **+Pers		** = Personal pronoun
- **+PersName	** = Personal name - proper noun
- **+Pl			** = Plural number
- **+Place		** = Place name - proper noun
- **+Poss		** = Possessive pronoun (can be attached to a prep, e.g. im', dá, faoina)
- **+Pref		** = Prefix; seperated prefixes in historical texts
- **+Prep		** = Preposition
- **+Pres		** = Copula present & future tense
- **+PresImp	** =  Pres Habitual - Gháthláithreach(Verb bí only - and deireann (abair)
- **+PresInd	** = Present Indicative
- **+PresSubj	** = Present Subjunctive
- **+Pro		** = Pronoun with copula or relative particle
- **+Pron		** = Pronoun
- **+Prop		** = Proper noun
- **+Punct		** = Abbreviation
- **+PUNCT		** = Abbreviation (it seems several languages have two tags :-/
- **+Q			** = Interrogative particle(q)
- **+Qty		** = Quantifier
- **+Quo		** = all quotation marks double, single etc.
- **+Ref		** = Reflexive particle
- **+Rel		** = Relative particle
- **+RelInd		** = rel. indirect
- **+RIGHT		** = Right side of parwise symbol (parenthesis or quotation mark)
- **+Rom 	** =
- **+Sbj	** =  Subject pronouns: sí, sé and siad are used only when pron follows predicate verb in  subject position, otherwise í, é and iad are used.
- **+Sem/Amount		    	** =
- **+Sem/Build		    	** =
- **+Sem/Build-room	    	** =
- **+Sem/Cat		    	** =
- **+Sem/Curr		    	** =
- **+Sem/Date		    	** =
- **+Sem/Domain		    	** =
- **+Sem/Domain_Hum	    	** =
- **+Sem/Dummytag	    	** =
- **+Sem/Edu_Hum	    	** =
- **+Sem/Event		    	** =
- **+Sem/Food-med	    	** =
- **+Sem/Group_Hum	    	** =
- **+Sem/Hum		    	** =
- **+Sem/ID			    	** =
- **+Sem/Lang		    	** =
- **+Sem/Mal		    	** =
- **+Sem/Mat		    	** =
- **+Sem/Measr		    	** =
- **+Sem/Money		    	** =
- **+Sem/Obj		    	** =
- **+Sem/Obj-el		    	** =
- **+Sem/Obj-ling	    	** =
- **+Sem/Org		    	** =
- **+Sem/Org_Prod-audio 	** =
- **+Sem/Org_Prod-vis   	** =
- **+Sem/Part		    	** =
- **+Sem/Plc		    	** =
- **+Sem/Prod-vis	    	** =
- **+Sem/Route		    	** =
- **+Sem/Rule		    	** =
- **+Sem/Sign		    	** =
- **+Sem/State		    	** =
- **+Sem/State-sick	    	** =
- **+Sem/Substnc	    	** =
- **+Sem/Sur		    	** =
- **+Sem/Time		    	** =
- **+Sem/Time-clock	    	** =
- **+Sem/Title		    	** =
- **+Sem/Tool-it	    	** =
- **+Sem/Txt		    	** =
- **+Sem/Veh		    	** =
- **+Sem/Year		    	** =
- **+Sg						** = Singular
- **+Short					** = Short determiner, e.g. m', d'
- **+Simp					** = Simple preposition
- **+Slender				** = Adj qualifies a plural noun ending in a slender consonant
- **+Span 					** =
- **+St						** = start bracket, quote etc
- **+Strong					** = same plural form for all cases
- **+Subj			** = Subjunctive mood/particle
- **+Subord			** = Subordinating conjunction
- **+Subst			** = substantive noun, functions like a noun, but lacks full inflectional pardigm
- **+Suf 			** = -s vern suffix e.g. a bhíonns
- **+Sup			** = Superlative particle (s), e.g. is
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
- **+Temp			** = Temporal e.g. inniu, amárach etc.
- **+Typo 			** = Typos, e.g. ta/ata  instead of tá/atá
- **+Use/-GC		** = 
- **+Use/-PLX		** = 
- **+Use/-PMatch	** = 
- **+Use/-Spell		** = 
- **+Use/-TTS		** = 
- **+Use/Circ		** = 
- **+Use/GC			** = 
- **+Use/NG			** = 
- **+Use/PMatch		** = 
- **+Use/SpellNoSugg	** = 
- **+Use/TTS		** = 
- **+V				** = n/a (Verb is used)
- **+VD				** = ditransitive verb
- **+VF				** = - form used before a word starting with a vowel or f+vowel 
- **+VI				** = intransitive verb
- **+VT				** = transitive verb
- **+VTI			** = transitive & intransitive verb
- **+Var 			** = variant spelling e.g. rabh instead of raibh or dheachaidh
- **+Vb				** = Verbal particle (Q)
- **+Verb			** = Verb
- **+Verbal			** = Verbal noun
- **+Voc			** = Vocative case 
- **+Vc				** = Vocative particle
- **+Vow			** = Vowel-initial : used to allow past-tense Len e.g. d´ith
- **+Weak			** = Weak plural (noun)
- **+XMLTag			** =  XML tags in the text, e.g. <p>, <title> etc.
- **+Xxx			** =  Indecipherable speech (in transcribed speech)
